sv: Bredd på visningsområde: Stor; Medium; Liten; Övrigt
es: Ancho del área de visualización: Grande; Medio; Pequeño; Otros
nb: Bredde for visningsområde: Stor; Middels; Liten; Annet
lt-LT: Langelio plotis: Didelis; Vidutinis; Mažas; Kita
cs: Šířka zorného pole: Velká; Médium; Malá; Jiné
ru: Ширина просмотрового окна: Большой; Средний; Маленький; Другой
it: Larghezza dell'area di visualizzazione: Large; Medio; Small; Altro
de: Sichtfeldbreite: Groß; Medium; Klein; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Lățimea zonei de vizualizare: Mare; Medie; Mcă; Altele
nl: Breedte weergavegebied: Groot; Medium; Klein; Andere
fr: Largeur de la zone de visualisation: Grande; Moyen; Petite; Autre
en: Viewing area width: Large; Medium; Small; Other
pl: Szerokość obszaru wyświetlania: Duży; Środek; Mała; Inne
tr: Görüntüleme Alanı Genişliği: Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Diğer
zh-TW: 可視區域寬度: 大; 媒介; 小; 其他
fi: Katselualueen leveys: Suuri; Keskimääräinen; Pieni; Muu
zh-CN: 可视区域宽度: 大; 媒介; 小; 其他
da: Visningsområdebredde: Stor; Medium; Lille; Andet
hr-HR: Širina područja gledanja: Velika; Srednja; Mala; Ostalo
ja: 視界領域の幅: 大; 媒体; 小; その他
sk-SK: Šírka zorného poľa: Veľký; Stredný; Malý; Iné
pt-BR: Largura da área de visualização: Grande; Médio; Pequena; Outro
hu: Látómező szélessége: Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Egyéb
ko: 시야 창 너비: 라지; 매체; 스몰; 기타
el: Πλάτος περιοχής θέασης: Μεγάλη; Μέση; Μικρός; Άλλο
bg-BG: Ширина на зрителната зона: Голяма; Средна; Малка; Други
sl-SI: Širina območja gledanja: Velika; Srednja; Majhna; Drugo
th: ความกว้างของพื้นที่ชมวิว: ใหญ่; สื่อ; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
vi: Chiều rộng khu vực xem: Lớn; Vừa; Nhỏ; Khác
pt-PT: Largura da área de visualização: Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro